New York, session 2025-2026, S6878.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 245.70 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 4-a to read as follows: 3 4-a. Where the people have established reasonable cause to believe 4 that the defendant is associated with a criminal street gang, as defined 5 in section 10-170 of the administrative code of the city of New York or 6 a criminal enterprise, as defined in section 460.10 of the penal law and 7 that the offense is connected to criminal street gang or criminal enter- 8 prise activity, there shall be a presumption that good cause exists for 9 the court to authorize the withholding by the people of the names, 10 adequate contact information, and statements of any victim or eyewitness 11 to the charged offense. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03404-01-5